Vermont statutes. Title 31 Recreation and Sports
Chapter 5. Municipal Recreation

§ 201.
Authority to appropriate for recreation.

A city by its council or an incorporated village, at an annual meeting, may appropriate such sums of money as it deems best, not exceeding four percent of its grand list, for the purchase of public playgrounds and lands, and for the construction and maintenance of buildings and equipment thereon, for public recreational purposes.
This section shall not apply to a city or incorporated village whose charter or bylaws authorize such appropriation.

§ 202.
Authority to establish and finance recreation system.

Municipalities, singly or jointly, may establish, maintain, and conduct a system of public recreation, including playgrounds; may set apart for such use any land or buildings owned or leased by it; may acquire land, buildings, and other recreational facilities by gift or purchase, and may issue bonds therefor as provided in

24 V.S.A. §§ 1751-1788

and equip and conduct the same; may employ a director of recreation and assistant; and may expend funds for the aforesaid purposes.

§ 203.
Control and supervision of system.

The legislative body may conduct the same through a department or bureau of recreation or may delegate the conduct thereof to a recreational board created by them, or to a school board or to any other appropriate existing board or commission.
The members of such body first appointed shall be appointed for such terms that the term of one member shall expire annually thereafter.

§ 204.
Free musical entertainments.

A municipality may appropriate such sums of money not exceeding five percent of its grand list, when the grand list of such municipality does not exceed $20,000.00, and a sum not to exceed three percent of the grand list of such municipality, when the grand list exceeds $20,000.00, to pay the expenses of free musical entertainments, to be held within its limits, at such times and places as is directed by such vote.